New Jersey, session 222, A449.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an institution of higher education shall place an automated external defibrillator, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-24), in an unlocked location in each athletic facility and student center with an appropriate identifying sign. The defibrillator shall be accessible during the normal operating hours of the athletic facility or student center and within reasonable proximity of the institutions athletic fields. b. The institution of higher education shall ensure that: (1) at least two staff members who are trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of the defibrillator, in accordance with the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-25), are in the athletic facility or student center during the normal operating hours; and (2) each defibrillator is tested and maintained according to the manufacturers operational guidelines, and notification is provided to the appropriate first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad, or other appropriate emergency medical services provider regarding the defibrillator, the type acquired, and its location in accordance with section 3 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-25). c. An institution of higher education and its staff shall, pursuant to the provisions of section 5 of P.L.1999, c.34 (C.2A:62A-27), be immune from civil liability in the acquisition and use of a defibrillator pursuant to this section. 2. a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an institution of higher education shall obtain a supply of naloxone hydrochloride nasal spray through a standing order issued pursuant to section 4 of the Overdose Prevention Act, P.L.2013, c.46 (C.24:6J-4) or section 1 of P.L.2017, c.88 (C.45:14-67.2) to be placed near an automated external defibrillator required pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of this act in a secure and easily accessible location with an appropriate identifying sign for the purpose of responding to an opioid overdose emergency. The naloxone hydrochloride nasal spray shall be maintained by the institution in quantities and types deemed adequate by the governing board of the institution in consultation with the Commissioner of Human Services. b. An institution of higher education shall designate a licensed campus medical professional to oversee the institutions program for the maintenance and emergency administration of naloxone hydrochloride nasal spray on campus, including the designation of members of the higher education community to administer naloxone hydrochloride nasal spray. c. An institution of higher education, licensed campus medical professional, member of the higher education community designated to administer naloxone hydrochloride nasal spray pursuant to subsection b. of this section, pharmacist, or an authorized health care practitioner who issues a standing order for naloxone hydrochloride nasal spray to an institution of higher education shall not be held liable for any good faith act or omission consistent with the provisions of this act. For purposes of this act, good faith shall not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness. 3. This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, except the Secretary of Higher Education may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.